Alabama, session 2026rs, HB56.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 32-6A-1 and 32-5A-245, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§32-6A-1
(a) For the purposes of this chapter, an "autocycle"
means a motor vehicle that is designed to travel with three
Page 1

means a motor vehicle that is designed to travel with three
HB56 INTRODUCED
wheels on the ground; is equipped with a steering wheel or
steering mechanism, a roll cage or roll hoops, a seat belt for
each occupant, brakes that meet the requirements of Federal
Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 122, and seating that does
not require the operator to straddle or sit astride the seat;
and is manufactured and certified to comply with the
applicable federal motorcycle safety standards under 49 C.F.R.
Part 571 by a manufacturer registered with the National
Highway Transportation Safety Administration.
(b) The operator of an autocycle shall be required to
have a regular driver's driver license and shall not be
required to have a Class M displayed on his or her driver's
driver license or a Class M motorcycle license.
(c) The operator of an autocycle shall be subject to
the seat belt requirements of the seat belt law provided in
Section 32-5B-4 and the motorcycle protective gear equipment
requirements provided in Section 32-5A-245 when operating the
vehicle.
(d) For the purposes of this title and Title 40, an
autocycle shall be registered, taxed, and titled in the same
manner as a motorcycle and shall otherwise be considered a
motorcycle for the purposes of this title and Title 40.
(e) A person An individual 17 years of age or younger
operating an autocycle shall be subject to the operating
hours, exceptions, and suspensions provided in Section
32-6-7.2."
"§32-5A-245
(a) No person individual shall operate or ride upon a
Page 2

(a) No person individual shall operate or ride upon a
HB56 INTRODUCED
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle unless he or she is wearing
protective headgear that complies with standards established
by Section 32-12-41.
(b) No person individual shall operate or ride upon a
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle unless he or she is wearing
shoes.
(c)(1) This section shall not apply to persons riding
within an enclosed cab.
(2) This section does not apply to the operator of an
autocycle, as defined under Section 32-6A-1.
(d) The Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
Agency may approve or disapprove protective headgear and may
adopt and enforce rules establishing standards and
specifications for the approval thereof. The secretary shall
publish lists of all protective headgear which have been
approved by him or her.
(e) No person individual shall knowingly permit or
allow any juvenile for whom he or she is a parent or guardian
to operate or ride upon a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
while not wearing a protective helmet of the kind authorized
by Section 32-12-41.
(f) No person individual shall knowingly permit or
allow any juvenile for whom he or she is a parent or guardian
to operate or ride upon a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
while not wearing shoes.
(g) No manufacturer, retailer, or other person shall
sell or offer for sale motorcycle helmets that fail to comply
with the standards established by the Secretary of the Alabama
Page 3

with the standards established by the Secretary of the Alabama
HB56 INTRODUCED
State Law Enforcement Agency pursuant to this section."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4